Maryland, session 2026, HB0186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–410.
(a) (1) (i) The Department may allow a person to hunt on each Sunday of
the game bird and game mammal seasons in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Calvert
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0186*

HOUSE BILL 186
3. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Caroline
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
4. Cecil County;
5. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Charles
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
6. Subject to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, Dorchester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
7. Garrett County;
8. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Queen
Anne’s County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
9. St. Mary’s County;
10. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.;
11. Washington County;
12. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
13. Subject to subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 and 12 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; [and]
2. On [the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November] EACH SUNDAY of the deer bow hunting season; AND
3. ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE TURKEY HUNTING SEASON
FOR A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A BOW AND ARROW.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)2, 3, 5, and 8 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday [during] OF the deer firearms season;

HOUSE BILL 186 3
2. On [the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November during] EACH SUNDAY OF the deer bow hunting season; and
3. A. ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE TURKEY HUNTING
SEASON FOR A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A BOW AND ARROW; AND
B. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season FOR
A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A HUNTING DEVICE OTHER THAN A BOW AND
ARROW.
(iv) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)6 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from the first
Sunday in October through the second Sunday in January, inclusive; [and]
2. ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE DEER BOW HUNTING
SEASON; AND
3. A. ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE TURKEY HUNTING
SEASON FOR A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A BOW AND ARROW; AND
B. On each Sunday of the spring turkey hunting season FOR
A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A HUNTING DEVICE OTHER THAN A BOW AND
ARROW.
(v) The time restrictions under subparagraph [(i)(13)] (I)13 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; [and]
2. On [the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November] EACH SUNDAY of the deer bow hunting season; AND
3. ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE TURKEY HUNTING SEASON
FOR A PERSON HUNTING TURKEY USING A BOW AND ARROW.
(2) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the
deer hunting seasons from the first Sunday in October through the second Sunday in
January, inclusive, AND ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE DEER BOW HUNTING SEASON, in:
(i) Carroll County; and
(ii) Frederick County.

HOUSE BILL 186
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the Department
may allow a person to hunt deer on each Sunday of the deer hunting seasons from 30
minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m. in:
1. Kent County;
2. Montgomery County; and
3. Talbot County.
(ii) The time restrictions under this paragraph do not apply:
1. To a participant in a junior deer hunt authorized under
this subtitle;
2. On one Sunday designated by the Department during the
deer firearms season;
3. In Kent County, on each Sunday [during] OF the deer bow
hunting season and the deer muzzle loader season;
4. In Montgomery County, on [one Sunday designated by the
Department during] EACH SUNDAY OF the deer bow hunting season; and
5. In Talbot County, on [the last three Sundays in October
and the first two Sundays in November during] EACH SUNDAY OF the DEER bow hunting
season.
(4) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer during the deer
firearms season:
(i) On each Sunday in Harford County; and
(ii) On the first Sunday in Anne Arundel County.
(5) The Department may allow a person to hunt deer [during the deer bow
hunting season on:
(i) The last three Sundays in October and the first two Sundays in
November in Harford County; and
(ii) The first Sunday in November in Anne Arundel County] ON
EACH SUNDAY OF THE DEER BOW HUNTING SEASON IN:
(I) ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY;

HOUSE BILL 186 5
(II) BALTIMORE CITY;
(III) BALTIMORE COUNTY;
(IV) HARFORD COUNTY;
(V) HOWARD COUNTY; AND
(VI) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(6) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALLOW A PERSON TO HUNT TURKEY
USING A BOW AND ARROW ON EACH SUNDAY OF THE TURKEY HUNTING SEASON IN:
1. ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY;
2. BALTIMORE CITY;
3. BALTIMORE COUNTY;
4. CARROLL COUNTY;
5. FREDERICK COUNTY;
6. HARFORD COUNTY;
7. HOWARD COUNTY;
8. KENT COUNTY;
9. MONTGOMERY COUNTY;
10. PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
11. TALBOT COUNTY.
(II) The Department may allow a person to hunt turkey USING A
HUNTING DEVICE OTHER THAN A BOW AND ARROW on each Sunday of the spring turkey
hunting season in:
[(i)] 1. Carroll County;
[(ii)] 2. Kent County; and

HOUSE BILL 186
[(iii)] 3. Talbot County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30
a.m.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the Department
may allow a person with a deer management permit to shoot deer on any Sunday
throughout the year in accordance with the terms of the permit.
(8) The Department may allow a person using a State certified raptor to
hunt game birds or mammals on each Sunday during the open season for the game birds
or mammals.
(9) The Department may allow an unarmed person participating in an
organized fox chase to chase foxes on Sunday.
(10) The Department may allow a person shooting pen–reared game birds
or tower–released flighted mallard ducks to hunt on Sunday at a regulated shooting ground
in accordance with § 10–906 of this title.
(11) The Department may allow a person who is 16 years old or younger to
hunt on Sunday if participating in a junior hunt established by the Department in
accordance with this subtitle.
(12) Except as provided in paragraphs (5), (6), AND (8) through (10) of this
subsection and subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection, a person may not hunt on Sunday
in:
(i) Baltimore City;
(ii) Baltimore County;
(iii) Howard County; or
(iv) Prince George’s County.
(13) A person may not hunt migratory game birds on Sunday.
(14) A person may not hunt on public land within the State park system on
Sunday.
(15) (i) The Department may not allow a person to hunt on public land
designated for hunting by the Department on Sunday except in:
1. Allegany County;
2. Cecil County;
3. Garrett County;

HOUSE BILL 186 7
4. St. Mary’s County;
5. Washington County;
6. Dorchester County, for turkey during the spring turkey
hunting season;
7. Frederick County, for deer from the first Sunday in
October through the second Sunday in January of the following year, inclusive;
8. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Somerset
County, on public land leased to a hunt club from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30
a.m.;
9. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, Worcester
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.; and
10. Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, Wicomico
County, from 30 minutes before sunrise until 10:30 a.m.
(ii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)8 and 9 of this
paragraph do not apply:
1. On each Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
(iii) The time restrictions under subparagraph (i)10 of this paragraph
do not apply:
1. On the first Sunday of the deer firearms season; and
2. On the last three Sundays in October and the first two
Sundays in November of the deer bow hunting season.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.